Maine, session 132, LD567.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §150-W is enacted to read:
§150-W. Dark Sky Week
The 2nd full week in May and the 2nd full week in September of each year is designated
as Dark Sky Week to celebrate the dark skies of the State and to bring attention to the
effects of artificial light on spring bird migration and the importance of curbing artificial
light pollution. The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation inviting and urging
citizens and schools to observe each week with appropriate activities and study.
Page 1 - 132LR1600(03)